Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 1, section 7, subdivision 8, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 88, article 2, section 15, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Flood Hazard Mitigation 40,300,000 (a) For the state share of flood hazard mitigation grants for publicly owned capital improvements to prevent or alleviate flood damage under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.161. To the extent practical, levee projects shall meet the state standard of three feet above the 100-year flood elevation. (b) Project priorities shall be determined by the commissioner as appropriate, based on need and consideration of available leveraging of federal, state, and local funds. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), $3,300,000 of this appropriation is for a grant to the city of Browns Valley for Phase II of the Toelle Coulee project to mitigate flood risks posed to the city, including construction of an East Levee, County State-Aid Highway 2 culvert replacement, and marked Trunk Highway 28 culvert replacement. (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), $5,000,000 of this appropriation is for grants to watershed districts that are members of the Red River Watershed Management Board for flood mitigation projects and is not for projects in the city of Moorhead. (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), $11,000,000 is for a grant to the city of Moorhead to design, construct, and equip flood mitigation infrastructure. This appropriation includes money for Phase 2 of the North Moorhead levee project, the relocation of sanitary lift station #2, and a levee project along First Avenue North. (f) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), $6,000,000 is from the general fund for a grant to the city of Carver for capital improvements to restore the Carver levee protecting an important historic district in Minnesota from flood waters of the Minnesota River. This levee restoration must meet the requirements for FEMA certification. The project includes predesign, design, engineering, land acquisition, and construction of capital improvements, including raising the height of the Carver levee, constructing internal drainage, establishing maintainable setbacks to adjacent structures, and certification by FEMA. new text begin (g) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), $175,000 is for a grant to the Chisago Lakes Lake Improvement District to repair the Lofton Avenue weir and the Lake Ellen weir in the Chisago Lakes Lake Improvement District. new text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end To the extent practicable and consistent with the project, recipients of appropriations for flood control projects in this subdivision shall create wetlands that are eligible for wetland replacement credit to replace wetlands drained or filled as the result of repair, reconstruction, replacement, or rehabilitation of an existing public road under Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.222, subdivision 1, paragraphs (l) and (m). deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end To the extent that the cost of a municipal project exceeds two percent of the median household income in the municipality multiplied by the number of households in the municipality, this appropriation is also for the local share of the project. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end